Hawaii statutes.
§386-54 Commutation of periodic payments.
Upon application of the disabled employee, the employee's dependents or the
employer, the director of labor and industrial relations may order that the
periodic benefit payments be commuted to one or more lump sum payments equal to
the present value at the time when the lump sum payments are due of the future
benefit payments, computed at four per cent true discount compounded annually,
if the director finds that such commutation is in the best interest of the employee
or the employee's dependents and does not impose undue hardship upon the
employer.

The probability of the death of the disabled
employee or of a dependent entitled to benefits before the expiration of the
period during which the employee or dependent is entitled to receive such
payments and the probability of the remarriage of the spouse shall be
determined in accordance with the latest United States Life Tables and the
American Remarriage Tables, respectively, as adjusted and corrected on the basis
of the most recent available experience, or in accordance with any other
appropriate actuarial tables selected by the director, upon advice of the chief
actuary of the Social Security Administration. The probability of the
happening of any other contingency affecting the amount or duration of the
benefit payments shall not be considered.

Payment of the lump sums shall discharge the
employer of the employer's liability for the corresponding income and indemnity
benefits. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-53; HRS §386-54; am L 1974, c
157, §1; gen ch 1985]

Law Journals and Reviews

Administering Justice or Just Administration: The Hawaii
Supreme Court and the Intermediate Court of Appeals. 14 UH L. Rev. 271 (1992).

Case Notes

Board may make lump sum payments not less than the present
worth of installments. 31 H. 672 (1930).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next